Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,239
Clearance lights, flares, and reflector requirements; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 60-6,236 to 60-6,238 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1935, c. 129, § 5, p. 461;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,116;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,120;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,165;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 335.